North Dakota statutes. TITLE 55 State Historical Society and State Parks
CHAPTER 55-12 Museum or Historical Society Unclaimed Property

55-12-01.
When property held by museum or historical society deemed abandoned.

Any property held by a museum or historical society in this state that is held for ten years or more and to which no person has made claim is deemed to be abandoned and becomes the property of the museum or society, provided the museum or society has complied with the publication and notice requirements of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 543, § 1.

55-12-02.
Publication of notice of abandoned property.

The museum or society shall publish a notice as a display advertisement entitled “notice of abandoned property held by a museum or historical society” at least once each week for two successive weeks in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the county in this state where the last-known address of any owner of property named in the notice is located. If no address is listed or if the address is outside this state, the notice must be published in the county in which the holder of the abandoned property has that person’s principal place of business within this state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 543, § 1.

55-12-03.
Notice requirements for abandoned property.

The published notice for abandoned property held by a museum or historical society must contain:

The name and last-known address, if any, of the last-known owner of property;

A description of the property; and

A statement that if proof of claim is not presented by the owner to the museum or society and if the owner’s right to receive the property is not established to the museum’s or society’s satisfaction within sixty-five days from the date of the second published notice, the property is deemed abandoned and becomes the property of the museum or society.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 543, § 1.

55-12-04.
Title to abandoned property vested in museum or historical society.

If no claim has been made to the property within sixty-five days from the date of the second published notice, title to the property vests in the museum or society, free of all claims of the owner and of all persons claiming through or under the owner.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 543, § 1.